Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.90.080

Electronic data tampering in the first degree.

(1) A person is guilty of electronic data tampering in the first degree if he or she maliciously and without authorization:

(a)(i) Alters data as it transmits between two data systems over an open or unsecure network; or

(ii) Introduces any malware into any electronic data, data system, or data network; and

(b)(i) Doing so is for the purpose of devising or executing any scheme to defraud, deceive, or extort, or commit any other crime in violation of a state law not included in this chapter, or of wrongfully controlling, gaining access to, or obtaining money, property, or electronic data; or

(ii) The electronic data, data system, or data network is maintained by a governmental [government] agency.

(2) Electronic data tampering in the first degree is a class C felony.

[ 2016 c 164 s 8.]